Louisiana, session 2026, HB967.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4(K) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
K. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an offender serving
a life sentence for an offense committed on or before July 2, 1973, and for which the
offender pleaded guilty, shall immediately be eligible for parole consideration.